Nebraska, session 109, LB614.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 16-901, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
16-901 (1) Except as provided in section 13-327 and subsection (2) of this
section, the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of a city of the first class
shall consist of the unincorporated area two miles beyond and adjacent to its
corporate boundaries.
(2) For purposes of sections 70-1001 to 70-1020, the extraterritorial
zoning jurisdiction of a city of the first class shall consist of the
unincorporated area one mile beyond and adjacent to its corporate boundaries.
(3) Any city of the first class may apply by ordinance any existing or
future zoning regulations, property use regulations, building ordinances,
electrical ordinances, plumbing ordinances, and ordinances authorized by
section 16-240 within its extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction with the same
force and effect as if such area were within the corporate limits of the city,
except that no such ordinance shall be extended or applied so as to prohibit,
prevent, or interfere with the conduct of existing farming, livestock
operations, businesses, or industry. The fact that the extraterritorial zoning
jurisdiction is located in a different county or counties than some or all
portions of the municipality shall not be construed as affecting the powers of
the city to apply such ordinances.
(4)(a) Any city of the first class may exempt from application of its
zoning regulations, property use regulations, building ordinances, electrical
ordinances, plumbing ordinances, and ordinances authorized by section 16-240
within its extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction, by action of the board of
adjustment pursuant to sections 19-907 to 19-915 and any applicable ordinance,
certain farm buildings when such structures are consistent with the
comprehensive development plan, including anticipated long-range future growth
based upon documented population and economic projections, as required by
sections 19-907 to 19-915.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, farm building means a building
utilized for agricultural purposes as defined in section 77-1359 on a farmstead
of twenty acres or more which produces one thousand dollars or more of farm
products each year.
(5)(a) (4)(a) A city of the first class shall provide written notice to
the county board of the county in which the city’s extraterritorial zoning
jurisdiction is located when proposing to adopt or amend a zoning ordinance
which affects the city’s extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction within such
county. The written notice of the proposed change to the zoning ordinance shall
be sent to the county board or its designee at least thirty days prior to the
final decision by the city. The county board may submit comments or
recommendations regarding the change in the zoning ordinance at the public
hearings on the proposed change or directly to the city within thirty days
after receiving such notice. The city may make its final decision (i) upon the
expiration of the thirty days following the notice or (ii) when the county
board submits comments or recommendations, if any, to the city prior to the
expiration of the thirty days following the notice.
(b) Subdivision (5)(a) (4)(a) of this section does not apply to a city of
the first class (i) located in a county with a population in excess of one
hundred thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal decennial
census or the most recent revised certified count by the United States Bureau
of the Census or (ii) if the city and the county have a joint planning
commission or joint planning department.
Sec. 2. Section 17-1001, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
17-1001 (1) Except as provided in section 13-327 and subsection (2) of
this section, the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of a city of the second
class or village shall consist of the unincorporated area one mile beyond and
adjacent to its corporate boundaries.
(2) For purposes of sections 70-1001 to 70-1020, the extraterritorial
zoning jurisdiction of a city of the second class or village shall consist of
the unincorporated area one-half mile beyond and adjacent to its corporate
boundaries.
(3) Any city of the second class or village may apply by ordinance any
existing or future zoning regulations, property use regulations, building
ordinances, electrical ordinances, and plumbing ordinances within its
extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction, with the same force and effect as if such
area was within its corporate limits. No such ordinance shall be extended or
-1-

LB614 LB614
2025 2025
applied so as to prohibit, prevent, or interfere with the conduct of existing
farming, livestock operations, businesses, or industry. The fact that the
extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction or part thereof is located in a different
county or counties than some or all portions of the municipality shall not be
construed as affecting the powers of the city or village to apply such
ordinances.
(4)(a) Any city of the second class or village may exempt from application
of its zoning regulations, property use regulations, building ordinances,
electrical ordinances, and plumbing ordinances within its extraterritorial
zoning jurisdiction, by action of the board of adjustment pursuant to sections
19-907 to 19-915 and any applicable ordinance, certain farm buildings when such
structures are consistent with the comprehensive development plan, including
anticipated long-range future growth based upon documented population and
economic projections, as required by sections 19-907 to 19-915.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, farm building means a building
utilized for agricultural purposes as defined in section 77-1359 on a farmstead
of twenty acres or more which produces one thousand dollars or more of farm
products each year.
(5)(a) (4)(a) A city of the second class or village shall provide written
notice to the county board of the county in which the extraterritorial zoning
jurisdiction of the city or village is located when proposing to adopt or amend
a zoning ordinance which affects the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of
the city or village within such county. The written notice of the proposed
change to the zoning ordinance shall be sent to the county board or its
designee at least thirty days prior to the final decision by the city or
village. The county board may submit comments or recommendations regarding the
change in the zoning ordinance at the public hearings on the proposed change or
directly to the city or village within thirty days after receiving such notice.
The city or village may make its final decision (i) upon the expiration of the
thirty days following the notice or (ii) when the county board submits comments
or recommendations, if any, to the city or village prior to the expiration of
the thirty days following the notice.
(b) Subdivision (5)(a) (4)(a) of this section does not apply to a city of
the second class or a village (i) located in a county with a population in
excess of one hundred thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent
federal decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the
United States Bureau of the Census or (ii) if the city or village and the
county have a joint planning commission or joint planning department.
Sec. 3. Original sections 16-901 and 17-1001, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, are repealed.
-2-